Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,142.03
Incorporated municipality; sales and use tax; petition to submit question.

(1) If the qualified electors of any municipality, equal in number to at least ten percent of the votes cast at the last preceding municipal election, petition the governing body to submit the question at least seventy-five days before the next primary, general, or special election, the governing body shall submit the question at the next primary, general, or special election.

(2) The question of imposing a sales and use tax which has been submitted to the electors and failed shall not be submitted to the electors of an incorporated municipality again until twenty-three months after such failure.

Laws 1978, LB 394, § 4;

Laws 1986, LB 890, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1175, § 3;

Laws 2009, LB501, § 6.

A petition seeking to enact a sales tax for the purpose of creating an endowment fund is governed by chapter 77 of the Nebraska Revised Statutes, and the proposed allocation of the tax to create an endowment fund does not remove the proposal from being governed by this section. Sydow v. City of Grand Island, 263 Neb. 389, 639 N.W.2d 913 (2002).